District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Residential Tranquility Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Residential Tranquility Act of 2010, effective May 26, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-
374; D.C. Official Code § 22-2751 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 22-2751) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “, for the purpose of
persuading one or more individuals, or the public, or to protest some action, attitude, or belief.”
and inserting a period in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “human beings” and inserting
the word “individuals” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) “Sound amplifying device” means any machine, device, or loudspeaker that
amplifies sound of the human voice, music, or any other sound. The term “sound amplifying
device” shall not include automobile audio systems when used and heard only by the occupants
of the vehicle in which the automobile audio system is installed.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 22-2752) is amended by adding new subsections (a-
1), (a-2), (a-3), and (a-4) to read as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a-1) It is unlawful for a person to target a residence for purposes of a demonstration by
using a sound amplifying device between 7:00 p.m. and 9:00 a.m. where the targeted residence
is, in fact, located in a Residential Zone, Residential Flat Zone, or Residential Apartment Zone,
as those terms and Zones are defined at the time of the of the conduct giving rise to the violation
in the District of Columbia Zoning Regulations.
“(a-2) It is unlawful to leave an unattended sound amplifying device emitting sound to
target a residence for purposes of a demonstration where the targeted residence is, in fact, located
in a Residential Zone, Residential Flat Zone, or Residential Apartment Zone, as those terms and
Zones are defined at the time of the of the conduct giving rise to the violation in the District of
Columbia Zoning Regulations.
“(a-3) It is unlawful to continue or resume targeting a residence in violation of subsection
(a-1) or (a-2) of this section after being instructed by a law enforcement officer to cease targeting
a residence in violation of this law.
“(a-4) The Mayor and Metropolitan Police Department may seize and impound any
unattended sound amplifying devices targeting a residence for purposes of a demonstration in
violation of subsection (a-2) of this section.”.
(c) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Throwing objects at residential property.
“(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly launch or throw an object onto the
residential property of another with the intent to cause fear, intimidate, or harass any person
living or working at that residence.
“(b) A person who violates this section, upon conviction, shall be fined no more than the
amount set forth in section 101 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Amendment Act of 2012,
effective June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C. Official Code § 22-3571.01), or incarcerated for
no more than 90 days, or both.”.
Sec. 3. Section 11201a(b)(2) of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government
Improvement Act of 1997, effective October 2, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-233; D.C. Official Code §
24-101.01(b)(2)), is amended by adding a new subparagraph (B-1) to read as follows:
“(B-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term expiration
date for a Council appointment to the Corrections Information Council shall be December 7th of
the year in which the term expires.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3